District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-905

Powers and duties.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-107, § 6, 25 DCR 1391
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 514, 60 DCR 3390

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1105.
1973 Ed., § 2-2505.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).

References in Text

“Section 304(b) of the Crime Control Act,” referred to in paragraph (7), formerly codified at 42 U.S.C. § 3734, was superseded by Pub. L. 90-351, Title I, § 304, as Pub. L. 98-473, added December 27, 1979, 93 Stat. 1178, Pub. L. 96-157, § 2, which was repealed by Title II, § 605(c) of the Act of October 12, 1984, 98 Stat. 2080, Pub. L. 98-473.

The “District of Columbia Home Rule Act,” referred to in paragraph (11), is the Act of December 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 774, Pub. L.